Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2135
Waste or trespass; occupant; right to use lands or timber for repairs.

Section 25-2134 is not intended to prevent the person who occupies the lands in the meantime from using them in the ordinary course of husbandry, or from using timber for the purpose of making suitable repairs thereon.

R.S.1867, Code § 641, p. 507;

R.S.1913, § 8252;

C.S.1922, § 9205;

C.S.1929, § 20-2137;

R.S.1943, § 25-2135.